Ohio, session 136, HB106.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. All items in this act are hereby appropriated 6
as designated out of any moneys in the state treasury to the 7
credit of the designated fund. For all operating appropriations 8
made in this act, those in the first column are for fiscal year 9
2026 and those in the second column are for fiscal year 2027. 10
The operating appropriations made in this act are in addition to 11
any other operating appropriations made for these fiscal years. 12
Section 2. 13
14
1 2 3 4 5
A DPS DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY
B General Revenue Fund

H. B. No. 106 Page 2
As Introduced
C GRF 769412 Ohio School Safety Center $25,000,000 $0
D TOTAL GRF General Revenue Fund $25,000,000 $0
E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $25,000,000 $0
OHIO SCHOOL SAFETY CENTER 15
(A) The foregoing appropriation item 769412, Ohio School 16
Safety Center, shall be used by the Department of Public Safety 17
to distribute, beginning January 1, 2026, or as soon as possible 18
thereafter, pilot grants to school districts, community schools 19
established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, STEM 20
schools established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, and 21
chartered nonpublic schools to purchase a wearable panic alert 22
system or other form of panic alert system or enter into a 23
contract with a private vendor for artificial intelligence 24
firearm detection software for the district's or school's 25
facilities. 26
(B) For the purposes of the pilot grant program, the 27
Department shall develop an application process, a method to 28
determine grant amounts, and criteria for approving grants 29
awarded under the program. The method used to determine grant 30
amounts shall, to the extent practicable, equally distribute 31
funds to districts and schools in urban, suburban, and rural 32
areas and to districts and schools with different student 33
enrollment sizes and socioeconomic statuses. The criteria for 34
approving grants shall include all of the following: 35
(1) A requirement that the district or school not have a 36
security system in place at the time the application is 37
submitted; 38

H. B. No. 106 Page 3
As Introduced
(2) A requirement that any panic alert system that a 39
district or school intends to purchase meets all of the 40
following criteria: 41
(a) The system is capable of integrating with local public 42
safety answering point infrastructure to transmit 9-1-1 calls 43
and mobile activations. 44
(b) The system is capable of initiating campus-wide 45
lockdown notifications. 46
(c) The system provides panic alert devices that allow for 47
immediate contact with emergency response agencies. 48
(d) The system was developed in the United States without 49
the use of any third-party or open-source data. 50
(e) The system is managed directly by the contracted 51
vendor through a constantly monitored operations center. 52
(f) The system has been successfully deployed in other 53
districts, schools, or state organizations. 54
(3) If a district or school intends to use a grant to 55
purchase a panic alert system, a requirement that the district 56
or school agrees to do all of the following to implement a panic 57
alert system purchased under the program: 58
(a) Provide each appropriate staff person in a school 59
facility, as determined by the district or school in 60
consultation with the device manufacturer or per the device 61
manufacturer's recommendations, with a panic alert device; 62
(b) Ensure that all school facility personnel receive 63
training on the protocol for and appropriate use of the panic 64
alert device; 65

H. B. No. 106 Page 4
As Introduced
(c) Ensure that all security data within a school 66
facility, including cameras, maps, and access control, is 67
accessible by a local law enforcement agency; 68
(d) Coordinate with the local law enforcement agency to 69
establish appropriate access protocols for security data. 70
(4) A requirement that any artificial intelligence firearm 71
detection software that a district or school intends to use 72
meets all of the following criteria: 73
(a) The software detects and alerts school district 74
personnel and first responders about the presence of visible, 75
unholstered firearms on school property. 76
(b) The software is designated as qualified anti-terrorism 77
technology under the "Support Anti-terrorism by Fostering 78
Effective Technologies Act of 2002," 6 U.S.C. 441, et seq. 79
(c) The software is capable of integrating with a school 80
building's security camera infrastructure. 81
(d) The software was developed in the United States 82
without the use of any third-party or open-source data. 83
(e) The software is managed directly by the contracted 84
vendor through a constantly monitored operations center that is 85
staffed by highly trained analysts who are capable of rapidly 86
communicating possible threats to law enforcement and 87
appropriate district or school personnel. 88
(f) The software has been successfully deployed in other 89
districts, schools, or state organizations. 90
(C) The Department shall distribute a grant to each 91
district or school with an approved application. 92

H. B. No. 106 Page 5
As Introduced
(D) A district or school that receives a grant under the 93
pilot grant program shall use the grant to purchase a wearable 94
panic alert system or other form of panic alert system or to 95
enter into a contract with a private vendor for artificial 96
intelligence firearm detection software. A district or school 97
may use a grant distributed under the pilot grant program to 98
purchase a panic alert system that uses firearm detection 99
software fully designated as qualified anti-terrorism technology 100
under the "Support Anti-terrorism by Fostering Effective 101
Technologies Act of 2002," 6 U.S.C. 441, et seq. 102
(E) Not later than December 1, 2027, the Department shall 103
submit to the Governor and the General Assembly, in accordance 104
with section 101.68 of the Revised Code, a report detailing the 105
findings of the pilot grant program. The report shall include 106
findings and data on program applications, grants awarded, 107
program participation, outcomes, and information on types of 108
devices purchased, firearm detection software utilized, types of 109
staff members receiving devices, cost of devices or software, 110
including annual renewal costs if applicable, frequency of 111
device use, and types of accidents reported. 112
Section 3. Within the limits set forth in this act, the 113
Director of Budget and Management shall establish accounts 114
indicating the source and amount of funds for each appropriation 115
made in this act, and shall determine the manner in which 116
appropriation accounts shall be maintained. Expenditures from 117
operating appropriations contained in this act shall be 118
accounted for as though made in, and are subject to all 119
applicable provisions of, the main operating appropriations act 120
of the 136th General Assembly. 121
Section 4. This act shall be known as Alyssa's Law. 122